Washington statutes.
RCW 19.305.100

Federal preemption.

If a federal reduced cigarette ignition propensity standard that preempts chapter 239, Laws of 2008 is adopted and becomes effective, the state director of fire protection shall prepare and submit to the legislature the necessary legislation to repeal this chapter.

[ 2008 c 239 s 11.]